North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-30.1 Venture Capital Corporations [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-02.
Certification — Investment reporting by venture capital corporations. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-03.
Unqualified investment — Civil penalties enforcement. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-04.
Venture capital corporation — Incorporation. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-05.
Tax credit. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-06.
Amount of tax credit. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-07.
Taxable year for credit. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-08.
Tax credit limits. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-09.
Tax credit — Procedure. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]

10-30.1-10.
Investment reporting forms. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 151, § 15]